New York, session 2025-2026, S8459.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil rights law is amended by adding a new section 2 50-h to read as follows: 3 § 50-h. Right to privacy; transcription. No person shall permit a 4 video conference meeting to be transcribed by artificial intelligence 5 without such meeting having a conspicuous disclosure during such meeting 6 that every person who attended such meeting may have their words from 7 such meeting transcribed by artificial intelligence. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13287-03-5